Utah statutes.
58-16a-502.    Unprofessional conduct.
"Unprofessional conduct" includes, in addition to the definition in Section
58-1-501:
(1)  using or employing the services of an optometric assistant to assist a
licensee in any manner not in accordance with:
(a)  the generally recognized practices and standards of ethics of the
profession; or
(b)  applicable state law or division rule;
(2)  failure to refer a patient to an appropriate licensed practitioner when:
(a)  the patient's condition does not respond to treatment; or
(b)  the treatment is not within the scope of competence or licensure of the
licensee;
(3)  providing confidential information regarding a patient to any third party
who does not have a legal and professional ground for obtaining the
information;
(4)  knowingly prescribing, selling, giving away, or administering any
prescription drug except for a legitimate medical purpose and upon a proper
diagnosis indicating the use of the drug in the amount prescribed or provided;
(5)  giving or receiving directly or indirectly any fee, commission, rebate,
or other compensation for professional services not actually and personally
rendered, except as part of a legal relationship within a lawful professional
partnership, corporation, or association;
(6)  failure to transfer pertinent and necessary information from a patient's
medical records to another optometrist or physician when so requested by the
patient or his representative, as designated in writing; or
(7)  failure to provide a contact lens prescription to a person who sells
contact lenses in accordance with Section 58-16a-306.
